Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6666XS (4) 91 sb/js S.F. 2273 Section 1. Section 476.6, subsections 7 and 8, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 7. Limitation on Frequency of filings. 3 a. A public utility shall not make a subsequent filing of 4 an application for a new or changed rate, charge, schedule, 5 or regulation which that relates to services for which a rate 6 filing is pending within twelve months following the date the 7 prior application was filed or until the commission has issued 8 a final order on the prior application, whichever date is 9 earlier, unless the public utility applies to the commission 10 for authority and receives authority to make a subsequent 11 filing at an earlier date. 12 b. Not later than July 1, 2029, and at least every three 13 years thereafter, a public utility shall file a general rate 14 case in which the commission shall confirm that the utilityâs 15 rates, cost allocations, and all other provisions of its tariff 16 are just and reasonable and based on each customer or customer 17 groupâs actual cost of service. If, on July 1, 2026, a utility 18 has not filed a general rate case since July 1, 2023, the 19 utility shall file a new general rate case by December 31, 20 2027. 21 8. Automatic adjustments. 22 a. This Unless otherwise provided in this subsection, 23 this chapter does not prohibit a public utility from making 24 provision for the automatic adjustment of rates and charges for 25 public utility service provided that a schedule showing the 26 automatic adjustment of rates and charges is first filed with 27 and approved by the commission. 28 b. A Unless otherwise provided in this subsection, a 29 public utility may automatically adjust rates and charges to 30 recover costs related to transmission incurred by or charged 31 to the public utility consistent with a tariff or agreement 32 that is subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy 33 regulatory commission, provided that a schedule showing the 34 automatic adjustment of rates and charges is first filed with 35 -1- LSB 6666XS (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 7 S.F. 2273 and approved by the commission. The commission shall adopt 1 rules regarding the reporting of transmission expenses and 2 transmission-related activity pursuant to this paragraph. 3 c. This subchapter prohibits an electric utility required 4 to be rate-regulated from making provisions for the automatic 5 adjustment of rates and charges for a public utility. 6 d. An electric utility required to be rate-regulated shall 7 not automatically adjust rates and charges to recover costs 8 related to transmission incurred or charged to the public 9 utility. 10 e. For an electric utility required to be rate-regulated, 11 as of the first filing under subsection 7, paragraph âbâ , and 12 continuing thereafter, any cost or expense recovered through 13 an automatic adjustment mechanism, tracker, or rider shall 14 be included and only adjusted in a general rate case under 15 subsection 7, paragraph âbâ . 16 Sec. 2. Section 476.53, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Customer-owned generation and storage 19 is vital to cost-effectively meeting rising demand for 20 electricity. Virtual power plants are a collection of 21 customer-owned distributed generation resources and energy 22 storage devices managed and dispatched by a common control 23 mechanism, which may only be located in the service territory 24 of a rate-regulated electric utility. Virtual power plants 25 shall not be considered public utilities under this chapter. 26 The commission shall promulgate rules that provide a process 27 and standards for the commissionâs approval and oversight of 28 virtual power plants, including information the commission 29 finds necessary for the evaluation of a virtual power plant 30 proposal. Such information shall include the nature of the 31 resources that may participate in a virtual power plant, 32 the entities who may propose virtual power plants, and the 33 estimated benefits to customers in the service territory in 34 which the virtual power plant will operate. The commission 35 -2- LSB 6666XS (4) 91 sb/js 2/ 7 S.F. 2273 shall not approve or continue to allow the operation of a 1 virtual power plant if the virtual power plant does not, under 2 standards established by the commission, benefit the customers 3 in the service territory in which the virtual power plant 4 operates. 5 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 476.53B Integrated resource planning. 6 1. To implement the intent of the general assembly as set 7 forth in sections 476.53 and 476.53A, each rate-regulated 8 public utility shall file with the commission an integrated 9 resource plan every three years, with the first plan due 10 July 1, 2027. The commission shall promulgate rules for the 11 development and evaluation of integrated resource plans. At a 12 minimum, the rules shall include all of the following: 13 a. A process under which a utility files a new plan every 14 three years that includes a five-year and a twenty-year 15 planning horizon. 16 b. A quantitative comparative analysis of multiple resource 17 mixes to serve anticipated customer needs using industry best 18 practices, including capacity expansion and production cost 19 modeling that include all of the following for both planning 20 horizons: 21 (1) Existing and potential generating resources needed to 22 serve customers, including competitively procured purchase 23 power agreements and market purchase. 24 (2) The process for determining the forecast projects, 25 costs, and other inputs and assumptions to be used in an 26 integrated resource plan by all parties. It is the intent of 27 the general assembly that the utilities use uniform scenarios, 28 inputs, assumptions, and sources of data. 29 (3) An assessment of customer costs and seasonal 30 reliability. 31 (4) Resources including energy efficiency, demand response, 32 peak load conservation, and distributed generation plans, 33 as described elsewhere in this chapter, that will assist in 34 meeting energy and capacity needs. 35 -3- LSB 6666XS (4) 91 sb/js 3/ 7 S.F. 2273 (5) A utilityâs energy and capacity forecasts, for existing 1 and potential generating resources, as described elsewhere 2 in this chapter, including filings made with any federal or 3 regional authority. The forecast shall include but is not 4 limited to a forecast of the requirements of customers, its 5 anticipated sources of supply, and its anticipated means of 6 addressing the forecasted electric generating needs. 7 (6) Transmission and distribution upgrades and expansion 8 plans needed to reliably serve the utilityâs customers and 9 integrate each potential resource, and the associated costs 10 of such plans in connection with the various resource mixes 11 proposed. 12 c. Determination of eligibility for access to modeling 13 software and data, including access to appropriate data from 14 the utilitiesâ production cost model scenarios. The commission 15 may determine the number of parties eligible for access to the 16 modeling software. 17 d. The ability of parties eligible for access to the 18 modeling software license to have at least four alternative 19 scenarios and a process to best balance and represent the input 20 of the respective parties. The alternative scenarios will be 21 included on equal footing with utility scenarios. 22 e. Annual reporting on the performance of the plan and any 23 nonmaterial updates. 24 f. Mechanisms for the utility to make, or for the 25 commission, the office of consumer advocate, or customers 26 to request, updates or modifications to the plan to reflect 27 material changes. 28 g. Other rules for the development and evaluation of 29 integrated resource plans the commission deems necessary or 30 appropriate. 31 2. The commission shall ensure the public has maximum 32 access to information, while protecting only the necessary 33 confidential information of the utility. The commission shall 34 require a uniform nondisclosure agreement that allows as much 35 -4- LSB 6666XS (4) 91 sb/js 4/ 7 S.F. 2273 access as possible to data and information, including that data 1 deemed by the commission as confidential. 2 3. Any proposed deviation from an integrated resource plan 3 must be demonstrated by the utility to be in the best interest 4 of customers when rate recovery or other approval of the 5 generation facility is sought. 6 4. The commission may employ additional temporary staff, or 7 may contract for professional services with persons who are not 8 state employees, as the commission deems necessary to perform 9 required functions as provided in this section, including but 10 not limited to promulgating rules for the development and 11 evaluation of resource plans. The costs of the additional 12 staff and services shall be assessed to the utilities pursuant 13 to the procedure in sections 475A.6 and 476.10. 14